District of Columbia statutes.
16-4017

Privilege against disclosure for collaborative law communication; admissibility; discovery.

(a)

Subject to §§ 16-4018 and 16-4019, a collaborative law communication is privileged under subsection (b) of this section, is not subject to discovery, and is not admissible as evidence.

(b)

In a proceeding, the following privileges apply:

(1)

A party may refuse to disclose, and may prevent any other person from disclosing, a collaborative law communication.

(2)

A nonparty participant may refuse to disclose, and may prevent any other person from disclosing, a collaborative law communication of the nonparty participant.

(c)

Evidence or information that is otherwise admissible or subject to discovery does not become inadmissible or protected from discovery solely because of its disclosure or use in a collaborative law process.

History

May 9, 2012, D.C. Law 19-125, § 2(b), 59 DCR 1928

Section References

This section is referenced in § 16-4018, § 16-4019, and § 16-4020.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 17 of the Uniform Collaborative Law Act.